Louisiana, session 2026, HB435.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 999(A) and 999.1 are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 999. Expungement of arrest records for certain individuals
A. A person shall be entitled to the expedited expungement of his arrest, at
no cost to him, if the person meets all either of the following:
(1) The person is seventeen years of age when the person is arrested or
charged with any criminal offense as provided in Title 14 or 40 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950.
(2) (1) The district attorney, for any reason, declined to prosecute all
offenses arising out of that arrest, including the reason that the person successfully
completed a pretrial diversion program.
(3) (2) Prosecution was instituted and such proceedings have been finally
disposed of by dismissal, sustaining of a motion to quash, or acquittal.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-686 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 435
Art. 999.1. Order form to be used; expedited expungement
JUDICIAL DISTRICT FOR THE PARISH OF
______________________________
No.: _____________ Division: "_______"
State of Louisiana
vs.
_______________________________________________________
ORDER OF EXPUNGEMENT UNDER
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE 999
Pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Article 999, wherein all either of the
following applies,
(1) The defendant was seventeen years of age when the defendant was
arrested or charged with any criminal offense as provided in Title 14 or 40 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(2) (1) The district attorney, for any reason, declined to prosecute all
offenses arising out of that arrest, including the reason that the person successfully
completed a pretrial diversion program.
(3) (2) Prosecution was instituted and such proceedings have been finally
disposed of by dismissal, sustaining of a motion to quash, or acquittal.
IT IS HEREBY ORDERED, ADJUDGED, AND DECREED that the
following charges and arrest on the dates provided herein be expunged.
THUS ORDERED AND SIGNED, ADJUDGED, AND DECREED this
____ day of ___________, 20 ____ at ______________, Louisiana,
___________________________.
___________________________
JUDGE
DEFENDANT INFORMATION:
NAME:________________________________________________
First Middle Last
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-686 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 435
DATE OF BIRTH:_____________
GENDER:_____________
SS#___________________________
RACE___________________________
DRIVER'S LICENSE#___________________
ARRESTING AGENCY___________________
SID#___________________
ARREST NUMBER (ATN)___________________
AGENCY ITEM NO:________________________
PLEASE SERVE:
1. District Attorney:________________________________________________
2. Arresting Agency:_______________________________________________
3. Parish Sheriff:_______________________________________
4. Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information
_____________________________
5. Attorney for Defendant (or defendant)____________________________
6. Clerk of Court ____________________________